Missouri, session 2026, HB2853.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.145 and 115.205, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.145, 115.205, 441.325, and 442.620, to
read as follows:
115.145. Each election authority shall have the following duties with respect to
registration:
(1) To conduct registration at its office or offices throughout the entire year, including
any four-week period prior to an election for the purpose of registration of persons for
subsequent elections, on all usual business days and during its regular office hours in the
manner required by this chapter;
(2) To instruct and direct each deputy registration official in the performance of his or
her duties including those agencies mandated and optional, including as optional any
institution of higher education located in the state, under the National Voter Registration Act
of 1993 and to supply each deputy with the proper registration forms and other necessary
supplies;
(3) To designate the times, dates and places or areas for additional voter registration
by any deputy appointed pursuant to subsection 2 of section 115.143, and to publicize the
times, dates and places or areas of such registration in any manner reasonably calculated to
inform the public; provided, that the place or area for voter registration by deputies appointed
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2853 2
under subsection 3 of section 115.143 shall be located in the school for which the deputy has
been appointed;
(4) Retain all voter registration records and registration list maintenance records for a
minimum of two years. The election authority shall compile data from the records as may be
necessary for compliance with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993;
(5) Number or use another system of identifying the original agency of the voter
registration application; and
(6) Make available for landlords and realtors a packet of information for new
residents, which shall include a voter registration form, instructions for the voter
registration form, a written explanation that adults already registered to vote in the
county will need to file a change of address, and any other information the election
authority deems appropriate.
115.205. 1. [No] Any person [shall be] who is paid or otherwise compensated for
soliciting more than ten voter registration applications, other than a governmental entity or a
person who is paid or compensated by a governmental entity for such solicitation, shall be
registered with the secretary of state as a voter registration solicitor. A voter registration
solicitor [who solicits more than ten voter registration applications] shall register for every
election cycle that begins on the day after the general election and ends on the day of the
general election two years later. A voter registration solicitor shall be at least eighteen years
of age and shall be a registered voter in the state of Missouri.
2. Each voter registration solicitor shall provide the following information in writing
to the secretary of state's office:
(1) The name of the voter registration solicitor;
(2) The residential address, including street number, city, state, and zip code;
(3) The mailing address, if different from the residential address;
(4) Whether the voter registration solicitor expects to be paid for soliciting voter
registrations;
(5) If the voter registration solicitor expects to be paid, the identity of the payor;
and
[(4)] (6) The signature of the voter registration solicitor.
3. The solicitor information required in subsection 2 of this section shall be submitted
to the secretary of state's office with the following oath and affirmation:
"I HEREBY SWEAR OR AFFIRM UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT ALL
STATEMENTS MADE BY ME ARE TRUE AND CORRECT.".
4. Any voter registration solicitor who knowingly fails to register with the secretary
of state is guilty of a class three election offense. Voter registration applications shall be
accepted by the election authority if such applications are otherwise valid, even if the voter

HB 2853 3
registration solicitor who procured the applications fails to register with or submits false
information to the secretary of state.
441.325. Upon signing a lease for a residence, a landlord shall provide a lessee
with the voter registration packet provided by the election authority of the county in
which the residence is located, as described under subdivision (6) of section 115.145.
442.620. Upon the closing of a sale of residential real estate, a realtor shall
provide a purchaser with the voter registration packet provided by the election
authority of the county in which the real estate is located, as described under
subdivision (6) of section 115.145.
✔